ko: 지원되는 이동식 저장소 형식: CF; CF 타입 II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC 마이크로; MMC 모바일; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro(M2); MSXC; MicroP2; 마이크로드라이브; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; 나노 메모리(NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SR메모리; 스마트 미디어 xD; 스마트미디어; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB 플래시 드라이브; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD 픽처 카드; 기타
hu: Támogatott cserélhető tárolóeszközök: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB flash meghajtó; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Egyéb
pt-BR: Formatos de armazenamento removíveis com suporte: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Flash Drive USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Cartão de imagem xD; Outro
de: Unterstützte Wechselspeicherformate: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC-Micro; MMC-Mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO Duo; MS PRO Duo HS; MS PRO Duo Mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG Duo; MS Pro-HG Duo HX; MS XC-HG Duo; MS Duo; MS Micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano Memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; SmartMedia xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB-Stick; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-Picture Card; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Formatos de armazenamento removíveis suportados: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Memória Nano (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Pen USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Cartão de imagem xD; Outro
vi: Các định dạng lưu trữ di động được hỗ trợ: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Bộ nhớ nano (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Ổ đĩa USB Flash; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Thẻ nhớ hình ảnh xD-picture card; Khác
fr: Formats de stockage amovibles pris en charge: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nanomémoire (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; Mémoire SR; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Clés USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD Picture Card; Autre
da: Aftagelige lagringsformater understøttes: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nanohukommelse (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB-flashdrev; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-billedkort; Andet
th: รองรับรูปแบบการจัดเก็บข้อมูลแบบถอดได้: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; MicroDrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; นาโนเมมโมรี่ (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; SmartMedia xD; SmartMedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; แฟลชไดรฟ์ USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibla format på flyttbar lagringsmedia: CF; CF typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nanominne (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMinne; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB-minne; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-bildkort; Annat
sl-SI: Podprti formati izmenljivega pomnilnika: CF; CF tipa II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano pomnilnik (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB bliskovni pogon; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Slikovna kartica xD; Drugo
pl: Obsługiwane formaty wymiennej pamięci masowej: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; Cfast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Pamięć nano (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Napęd flash USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Pozostałe
en: Removable storage formats supported: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB flash drive; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Other
es: Formatos de almacenamiento extraíbles compatibles: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC móvil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO dúo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nanomemoria (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Unidad flash USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Otros
fi: Tuetut poistettavat tallennusformaatit: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB-muistitikku; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-kuvakortti; Muu
el: Υποστηριζόμενες αφαιρούμενες μορφές αποθήκευσης: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Οδηγός USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Κάρτα xD-picture; Άλλο
hr-HR: Podržani formati prijenosne pohrane: CF; CF tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC Micro; Mobilni MMC; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO Duo; MS PRO Duo HS; MS PRO Duo Mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG Duo; MS Pro-HG Duo HX; MS XC-HG Duo; MS Duo; MS Micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memorija (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; SmartMedia xD; SmartMedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB Flash memorija; XQD; ExpressP2; microSD; microSDHC; MicroSDXC; xD; Kartica xD-Picture; Ostalo
tr: Desteklenen Çıkarılabilir Depolama Formatları: CF; CF Tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB bellek; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-resim kartı; Diğer
lt-LT: Palaikomi atminties kortelių formatai: CF; CF II tipas; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; „CFexpress“; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; „MMC micro“; „MMC mobile“; „MMCplus“; MS; MS PRO; „MS PRO duo“; „MS PRO duo HS“; „MS PRO duo mark 2“; MS Pro-HG; „MS Pro-HG duo“; „MS Pro-HG duo HX“; „MS XC-HG duo“; „MS duo“; „MS micro“ (M2); MSXC; „MicroP2“; „Microdrive“; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; „Nano memory“ (NM); P2; „PSVita“; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; „SRMemory“; „Smart Media xD“; „Smartmedia“; SxS; „SxS Pro“; SxS-1; USB atmintinė; XQD; expressP2; „microSD“; „microSDHC“; „microSDXC“; xD; xD vaizdo kortelė; Kita
it: Formati di storage rimovibili supportati: CF; CF Tipo II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Memoria nano (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Unità flash USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Scheda immagini xD; Altro
sk-SK: Podporované formáty vymeniteľného úložiska: CF; CF typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano pamäť (NM); P2; PSVitamark; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Inteligentné médiá xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB flash disk; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Iné
cs: Podporované formáty vyměnitelného úložiště: CF; CF Typ II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB flash disk; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Jiné
ru: Поддерживаемые форматы съемных носителей: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano Memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart Media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Флеш-накопитель USB; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Другое
nl: Ondersteunde verwijderbare opslagformaten: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobiel; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano-geheugen (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB-stick; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-picture card; Andere
ja: 対応しているリムーバブルストレージのフォーマット: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMCマイクロ; MMCモバイル; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PROデュオ; MS PROデュオHS; MS PROデュオマーク2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HGデュオ; MS Pro-HGデュオHX; MS XC-HGデュオ; MSデュオ; MSマイクロ (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; マイクロドライブ; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; ナノメモリ (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRメモリ; スマートメディアxD; スマートメディア; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USBフラッシュドライブ; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xDピクチャーカード; その他
nb: Flyttbare lagringsformater støttes: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobil; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nanominne (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; Minnepenn; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-bildekort; Annen
bg-BG: Поддържани преносими формати за съхранение: CF; CF Type II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Нанопамет (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB флаш устройство; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; карта xD-picture; Други
ro-RO: Formate de stocare amovibile acceptate: CF; CF tip II; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; Microdrive; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; Nano memory (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart media xD; Smartmedia; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB flash drive; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; Card xD-picture; Altele
zh-TW: 支援的可移式儲存裝置格式: CF; CF II 型; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC mobile; MMCplus; MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; 微型硬碟; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; NM 卡 (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; SD; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; Smart Media xD; SmartMedia; SxS; SXS Pro; SxS-1; 隨身碟; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD 圖像卡; 其他
zh-CN: 支持的可移动存储格式: CF; CF II 型; CF+; CFast; CFast 2.0; CFexpress; DV RS-MMC; EXD; Eye-Fi; FLU; HC MMC+; MMC; MMC micro; MMC 移动; 增强型多媒体卡 (MMCplus); MS; MS PRO; MS PRO duo; MS PRO duo HS; MS PRO duo mark 2; MS Pro-HG; MS Pro-HG duo; MS Pro-HG duo HX; MS XC-HG duo; MS duo; MS micro (M2); MSXC; MicroP2; 微型硬盘; MiniMMC; MiniSD; MiniSDHC; MiniSDXC; 纳米存储器 (NM); P2; PSVita; RS-MMC; 标清; SDHC; SDIO; SDXC; SRMemory; 智能媒体 xD; 智能媒体; SxS; SxS Pro; SxS-1; USB 闪存驱动器/U 盘; XQD; expressP2; microSD; microSDHC; microSDXC; xD; xD-图片卡; 其他